South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3553.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 8-15-65 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 8-15-65. (A) The General Assembly shall appropriate annually salary supplements for the following county officers: (1) clerks of court; (2) probate judges; (3) sheriffs; (4) registers of deeds; (5) auditors; (6) treasurers; (7) directors of county boards of voter registration and elections. (B) The amounts appropriated for salary supplements pursuant to subsection (A) must include both salary and related employer contributions and are in addition to amounts provided as compensation for these officials by counties. To the extent that compensation for these officers is reduced by a county or there is any other reduction of expenditures in the operations of their offices, a corresponding reduction must be made in the distribution otherwise due the county pursuant to Chapter 27 of Title 6, the State Aid to Subdivisions Act. (C) Except as provided in subsection (B), the salary supplement must be uniform with respect to a particular county officer but may vary between the different category of officers. (D) Amounts appropriated for the officers listed in subsection (A)(1), (2), (3), and (4) must be paid to county treasurers in a lump sum at the beginning of the fiscal year and paid to these officers over a twelve-month period in the same manner that salaries are paid county employees. Amounts appropriated pursuant to this section for the officers listed in subsection (A)(5), and (6), and (7) must be administered by the Office of the Comptroller General and paid in accordance with the schedule and method of payment provided for state employees. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----